Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 20
COLORADO NEW ENERGY IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT

Section

32-20-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "New Energy Jobs Creation Act of 2010".

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2201, § 1, effective June 11.

32-20-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is in the best interest of the state and its citizens and a public purpose to enable and encourage the owners of eligible real property to invest in new energy improvements, including energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy improvements, sooner rather than later by creating the Colorado new energy improvement district and authorizing the district to establish, develop, finance, implement, and administer a new energy improvement program that includes both energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy improvements to assist any such owners who choose to join the district in completing new energy improvements to their property because:

New energy improvements, including energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy improvements, help protect owners of eligible real property from the financial impact of the rising cost of electricity produced from nonrenewable fuels and can even provide positive cash flow in many instances in which the costs of the improvements are spread out over a long enough time so that the owners' utility bill cost savings exceed the special assessments levied on the eligible real property to pay for the improvements;

The inclusion of both energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy improvements in the new energy improvement program will help to promote informed choices and maximize the benefits of the program for both individual owners of eligible real property and society as a whole;

Reduction in the amount of emissions of greenhouse gases and environmental pollutants resulting from decreased use of traditional nonrenewable fuels will improve air quality and may help to mitigate climate change;

New energy improvements, including energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy improvements, increase the value of the eligible real property improved;

The commitment of a significant amount of sustainable funding for increased construction of new energy improvements will create jobs and stimulate the state economy:

By directly creating jobs for contractors and other persons who complete new energy improvements; and

By reinforcing the leadership role of the state in the Colorado energy economy and thereby attracting new energy manufacturing facilities and related jobs to the state; and

The new energy improvement program provides a meaningful, practical opportunity for average citizens to take action that will benefit their personal finances and the economy of the state, promote their own and the nation's energy independence and security, and help sustain the environment; and

In many cases, the owner of eligible real property is unable to fund a new energy improvement because the owner does not have sufficient liquid assets to directly fund the improvement and is unable or unwilling to incur the negative net cash flow likely to result if the owner uses a typical home equity loan or line of credit or other loan to fund the improvement.

The general assembly further finds and declares that it is necessary, appropriate, and legally permissible under section 20 of article X of the state constitution and all other constitutional provisions and laws to authorize the Colorado new energy improvement district, without voter approval in advance, to generate the capital needed to reimburse owners of eligible real property who voluntarily join the district for, or directly pay for all or a portion of the cost of, completing new energy improvements, including energy efficiency improvements and renewable energy improvements, to the property by levying special assessments and issuing special assessment bonds to be paid from the revenues generated by the special assessments because:

Under the Colorado supreme court's decision in Campbell v. Orchard Mesa Irrigation District, 972 P.2d 1037 (Colo. 1998), the Colorado new energy improvement district is neither the state nor a local government and therefore is not a district, as defined in section 20 (2)(b) of article X of the state constitution, subject to the requirements of section 20 of article X of the state constitution because:

The district is not authorized to levy general taxes;

Although the district is a public corporation that serves the public purposes of promoting new energy improvements and creating jobs, it does not have elected board members and primarily exists to serve the interests of owners of eligible real property who voluntarily join the district in order to fund new energy improvements to the property; and

The district is endowed by the state pursuant to this article with only the powers necessary to perform its predominantly private objective;

There is no legal impediment to the imposition of special assessments and the issuance of special assessment bonds without an election by an entity like the Colorado new energy improvement district that is formed by law, has statewide jurisdiction, and is governed by an appointed board;

The burden of a special assessment is voluntarily assumed by the owner of the eligible real property on which the special assessment is levied because:

A special assessment may only be levied on eligible real property if the owner of the property has voluntarily joined the district, agreed to accept reimbursement or a direct payment, and consented to the levy of a special assessment; and

A subsequent purchaser of eligible real property upon which a special assessment has been levied purchases the property with full knowledge of the special assessment; and

Both an owner of eligible real property who joins the district and receives reimbursement or a direct payment and any subsequent owner of the property receive the special benefit of the new energy improvement for which the district has made reimbursement or a direct payment in proportion to or in excess of the amount of the special assessment paid.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2202, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2012:

(1)(a)(V)(B) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 975, § 39, effective July 1.

32-20-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(1.5) "Commercial building" means any real property other than a residential building containing fewer than five dwelling units and includes any other improvement or connected land that is billed with the improvement for purposes of ad valorem property taxation.

"District" means the Colorado new energy improvement district created in section 32-20-104 (1).

"District member" means a qualified applicant whose application to join the district, receive reimbursement or a direct payment, and consent to the levying of a special assessment is approved by the district.

"Eligible real property" means a residential or commercial building, located within a county in which the district has been authorized to conduct the program as required by section 32-20-105 (3), on which or in which a new energy improvement to be financed by the district has been or will be completed.

"Energy efficiency improvement" means one or more installations or modifications to eligible real property that are designed to reduce the energy consumption of the property and includes, but is not limited to, the following:

Insulation in walls, roofs, floors, and foundations and in heating and cooling distribution systems;

Storm windows and doors, multiglazed windows and doors, heat-absorbing or heat-reflective glazed and coated window and door systems, additional glazing, reductions in glass area, and other window and door system modifications that reduce energy consumption;

Automatic energy control systems;

Heating, ventilating, or air conditioning and distribution system modifications or replacements in a building;

Caulking and weatherstripping;

Replacement or modification of lighting fixtures to increase the energy efficiency of the system;

Energy recovery systems;

Daylighting systems;

Electric vehicle charging equipment added to the building or its associated parking area; and

Any other modification, installation, or remodeling approved as a utility cost-savings measure by the district, including water conservation fixtures, both indoor and outdoor and for both hot and cold water.

"Loan balance" means the outstanding principal balance of loans secured by a mortgage or deed of trust with a first or second lien on eligible real property.

"New energy improvement" means one or more on-site energy efficiency improvements or renewable energy improvements, or both, made to eligible real property that will reduce the energy consumption of or add energy produced from renewable energy sources with regard to any portion of the eligible real property.

"Program" means the new energy improvement program established by the district in accordance with section 32-20-105.

"Program administrator" or "administrator" means an entity hired by the district to administer the program on behalf of the district to the extent specified in a contract between the district and the administrator. Neither the district nor its program administrator shall offer rebates for the purchase of renewable energy credits. The district's activities shall be limited to funding new energy improvements and to marketing that funding.

"Qualified applicant" means a person who:

Repealed.

Timely submits to the district a complete application, which notes the existence of any first priority mortgage or deed of trust on the eligible real property and the identity of the holder thereof, to join the district, have the eligible real property included in the district's boundaries, receive reimbursement or a direct payment, and consent to the levying of a special assessment on the property. Within thirty days of a person's submission of an application to the district, the district shall provide written notice to the holder of any first priority mortgage or deed of trust on the eligible real property that the person is participating in the district.

Meets any standard of credit-worthiness that the district may establish.

"Reimbursement or a direct payment" means the payment by the district to a district member, or on behalf of a district member to a contractor that has completed a new energy improvement to the district member's eligible real property, of all or a portion of the cost of completing a new energy improvement. Utility rebates offered to program participants by a qualifying retail utility for the purpose of compliance with renewable energy targets established in section 40-2-124, C.R.S., are subject to the retail rate impact cap established pursuant to section 40-2-124 (1)(g)(I), C.R.S.

"Renewable energy improvement" means one or more fixtures, products, systems, or devices, or an interacting group of fixtures, products, systems, or devices, that directly benefit eligible real property through a qualified community location, as defined in section 30-20-602 (4.3), C.R.S., enacted by Senate Bill 10-100, enacted in 2010, or that are installed behind the meter of any eligible real property and that produce energy from renewable resources, including but not limited to photovoltaic, solar thermal, small wind, low-impact hydroelectric, biomass, fuel cell, or geothermal systems such as ground source heat pumps, as may be approved by the district; except that no renewable energy improvement shall be authorized that interferes with a right held by a public utility under a certificate issued by the public utilities commission under article 5 of title 40, C.R.S. Nothing in this article shall limit the right of a public utility, subject to article 3 or 3.5 of title 40, C.R.S., or section 40-9.5-106, C.R.S., to assess fees for the use of its facilities or modify or expand the net metering limitations established in sections 40-9.5-118 and 40-2-124 (7), C.R.S. Primary jurisdiction to hear any disputes as to whether a renewable energy improvement interferes with such a right shall lie:

In the case of a regulated utility, with the public utilities commission; and

In the case of a municipally-owned electric utility, with the governing body of the municipality.

"Residential building" means an improvement to real property that is designed for use predominantly as a place of residency. The term also includes any other improvement or connected land that is billed with the improvement for purposes of ad valorem property taxation.

"Special assessment" or "assessment" means a charge levied by the district against eligible real property specially benefited by a new energy improvement for which the district has made or will make reimbursement or a direct payment that is proportional to the benefit received from the new energy improvement and does not exceed the estimated amount of special benefits received or the full cost of completing the new energy improvement.

"Special assessment bond" or "bond" means any bond, note, interim certificate, loan agreement, contract, or other evidence of borrowing of the district issued by the district pursuant to this article that is payable, in whole or in part, from revenues generated by special assessments levied as authorized in this article and, at the discretion of the board, from any other legally available source of moneys lawfully pledged for their repayment.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2204, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2013:

(1.5) and (5)(j) added, (4), IP(5), (5)(f), (5)(h), (5)(i), (7), (11), IP(12), and (14) amended, and (10)(a) repealed, (SB 13-212), ch. 347, p. 2013, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2014:

(5)(j) amended, (SB 14-171), ch. 195, p. 718, § 1, effective August 6.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (1.5) and (5)(j) were added, subsection (4), the introductory portion to subsection (5), subsections (5)(f), (5)(h), (5)(i), (7), and (11), the introductory portion to subsection (12), and subsection (14) were amended, and subsection (10)(a) was repealed by the "New Energy Jobs Act of 2013". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

32-20-104. Colorado new energy improvement district - creation - board - meetings - quorum - expenses - records.

The Colorado new energy improvement district is hereby created as an independent public body corporate, and the boundaries of the district shall include the eligible real property that is owned by a person who has voluntarily joined the district. The district constitutes a public instrumentality, and its exercise of the powers conferred by this article shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function, but the district:

Shall not be an agency of state government or of any local government;

Shall not be subject to administrative direction by any department, commission, board, or agency of the state or any local government; and

Shall not be a district, as defined in section 20 (2)(b) of article X of the state constitution, for purposes of section 20 of said article X.

The district is governed by a board of directors, which shall exercise the powers of the district, shall, by a majority vote of a quorum of its members, select from its membership a chair, vice-chair, and secretary, and is composed of seven members, including:

The director of the Colorado energy office created in section 24-38.5-101 (1), C.R.S., or the director's designee;

The following six members appointed by the governor:

One member who has executive-level experience in commercial or residential real estate development;

Two members who each have at least ten years of executive-level experience with one or more financial institutions, at least one of whom has had such experience with one or more financial institutions having total assets of less than one billion dollars;

One member who has executive-level experience in the utility industry;

One member who represents the energy efficiency industry; and

One member who represents the renewable energy industry.

to (VI) Repealed.

The term of an appointed member is four years.

Notwithstanding any other law, it is not a conflict of interest for a trustee, director, officer, or employee of any public utility, financial institution, investment banking firm, brokerage firm, commercial bank or trust company, insurance company, law firm, or other firm, corporation, or business entity to serve as a board member, the executive director of the district, or an employee of the district. However, a board member, executive director, or other employee who is also such a trustee, director, officer, or employee shall disclose his or her business affiliation to the board and shall abstain from voting or otherwise taking action in any instance in which his or her business affiliation is directly involved.

A member of the board, any executive director of the district, and any employee of the district shall be immune from civil liability for any action taken in good faith in the course of the member's, director's, or employee's duties for the district.

Members of the board shall receive no compensation for services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including travel and lodging expenses, incurred in the discharge of their official duties. Any payments for compensation and expenses shall be paid from funds of the district.

Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the powers of the board. Action may be taken by the board upon the affirmative vote of at least four of its members. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the board.

The district shall be subject to the open meetings provisions of the "Colorado Sunshine Act of 1972", part 4 of article 6 of title 24, C.R.S., and the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S. The board shall also promulgate and adhere to policies and procedures that govern its conduct, provide meaningful opportunities for public input, and establish standards and procedures for calling emergency meetings. One or more members of the board may participate in a meeting of the board and may vote through the use of telecommunications devices, including, but not limited to, a conference telephone or similar communications equipment. Participation through telecommunications devices shall constitute presence in person at a meeting. The use of telecommunications devices shall not supersede any requirements for a public hearing otherwise provided by law.

The district shall be subject to the "Local Government Budget Law of Colorado", part 1 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S., and the "Colorado Local Government Audit Law", part 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.

The district is a special district included within the definition of the state or any of its political subdivisions for purposes of and as set forth in section 2 (14.6) of article XXVIII of the state constitution and is, accordingly, subject to the sole source contracting provisions of sections 15 to 17 of said article XXVIII.

Because the district is not a part of state government or a county or municipality, neither the district nor any member of the board, executive director of the district, or employee of the district shall be subject to the provisions of article XXIX of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2207, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2012:

(2)(a)(I)(A) amended, (HB 12-1315), ch. 224, p. 976, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

IP(2)(a), (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), and (3) amended and (2)(a)(III), (2)(a)(IV), (2)(a)(V), and (2)(a)(VI) repealed, (SB 13-212), ch. 347, p. 2015, § 3, effective May 28.

L. 2016:

IP(2)(a)(II) and (6) amended, (SB 16-171), ch. 238, p. 974, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2022:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 74, § 100, effective February 25.

Editor's note:

Sections 2 (14.6) and 15 to 17 of article XXVIII of the state constitution referenced in subsection (6) were declared unconstitutional. See

Dallman v. Ritter

, 225 P.3d 610 (Colo. 2010).

Cross references:

In 2013, the introductory portion to subsection (2)(a) and subsections (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), and (3) were amended and subsections (2)(a)(III), (2)(a)(IV), (2)(a)(V), and (2)(a)(VI) were repealed by the "New Energy Jobs Act of 2013". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

32-20-105. District - purpose - general powers and duties - new energy improvement program.

The purpose of the district is to help provide the special benefits of new energy improvements to owners of eligible real property who voluntarily join the district by establishing, developing, financing, and administering a new energy improvement program through which the district can provide assistance to such owners in completing new energy improvements. The district may exercise any of the powers granted to the district in this article before any eligible real property is included within the boundaries of the district; except that the district shall exercise the powers to levy special assessments and issue special assessment bonds only after eligible real property is included within the boundaries of the district.

In order to allow the district to achieve its purpose, in addition to any other powers and duties of the district specified in this article, the district shall have the following general powers and duties:

To have perpetual existence;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and conduct of its business;

To set an annual budget;

To sue and be sued and to be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

To enter into contracts and agreements needed for its functions or operations;

To acquire, dispose of, and encumber real and personal property needed for its functions or operations;

To borrow money for the purpose of defraying district expenses, including, but not limited to, the funding of appropriate loss reserves, or for any other purpose deemed appropriate by the board;

To invest any moneys of the district in accordance with part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.;

To hire and set the compensation of a program administrator and to appoint, hire, retain, and set the compensation of other agents and employees and contract for professional services.

The board may delegate any of the powers and duties of the district that specifically pertain to the establishment, development, financing, and administration of the program to any program administrator the district hires; except that the district shall not delegate the power to establish assessment units, the power to determine the method of calculating special assessments, or the power to issue special assessment bonds.

In accordance with sections 32-20-106 to 32-20-108, to establish special assessment units, levy and collect special assessments on eligible real property specially benefited by a renewable energy improvement for which the district made reimbursement or a direct payment, and issue special assessment bonds;

To accept gifts and donations and apply for and accept grants upon such terms or conditions as the board may approve; and

To have and exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted to the district by this article. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this article.

The district shall establish, develop, finance, and administer a new energy improvement program. However, the district may conduct the program within any given county only if the board of county commissioners of the county has adopted a resolution authorizing the district to conduct the program within the county. If a county adopts a resolution authorizing the district to conduct the program within the county, the county treasurer shall retain a collection fee as specified in section 30-1-102 (1)(c) for each special assessment that it collects as part of the program. The board of county commissioners of any county that has adopted a resolution authorizing the district to conduct the program within the county may subsequently adopt a resolution deauthorizing the district from conducting the program within the county. However, if the county adopts a deauthorizing resolution, the county shall continue to meet all of its obligations under this article 20 as to program financing obligations existing on the effective date of the deauthorization until any and all special assessments within the county have been paid in full and remitted to the district. The district shall design the program to allow an owner of eligible real property to apply to join the district, receive reimbursement or a direct payment from the district, and consent to the levying of a special assessment on the eligible real property specially benefited by a new energy improvement for which the district makes reimbursement or a direct payment. The district shall establish an application process for the program that allows an owner of eligible real property to become a qualified applicant by submitting an application to the district and that may include one or more deadlines for the filing of an application. Except as specified in section 32-20-111, the application process must require the applicant to submit with the application a commitment of title insurance issued by a duly licensed Colorado title insurance company within thirty days before the date the application is submitted. The district may charge program application fees. In order to administer the program, the district, acting directly or through a program administrator or other agents, employees, or professionals as the district may appoint, hire, retain, or contract with, may aggregate qualified applicants into one or more bond issues and shall:

Market the program to owners of eligible real property, encourage such owners to obtain the special benefits of completing new energy improvements to their property by providing more attractive and accessible means of funding the completion of new energy improvements, and accept and process program applications from any such owners who are qualified applicants;

Specify the information to be included in a program application. The district shall require an owner of eligible real property who submits a program application to include, at a minimum, a postal address or electronic mail address at which the district may contact the owner, the name and postal or electronic mailing address of any person holding a lien against the eligible real property, and any information that the district requires to verify that the owner will complete a new energy improvement, verify the cost of completing the new energy improvement, determine the appropriate amount of reimbursement or a direct payment to be made to the applicant or a contractor after the new energy improvement has been completed, and estimate the value of the special benefit provided by the completed new energy improvement to the applicant's eligible real property.

Establish such standards, guidelines, and procedures, including but not limited to standards of credit-worthiness for qualification of program applicants, as are necessary to ensure the financial stability of the program and otherwise prevent fraud and abuse;

Encourage or require, as determined by the district, any qualified applicant to obtain an energy audit in order to ensure the efficient use of new energy improvement funding pursuant to this article;

Inform prospective program applicants and qualified applicants of private financing options not provided by the district, including, as appropriate, home equity loans, home equity lines of credit, commercial loans, and commercial lines of credit that may, with respect to a particular applicant, represent viable alternatives for financing new energy improvements;

Take appropriate steps to establish qualifications for the certification of contractors to construct or install new energy improvements; and

Take appropriate steps to monitor the quality of new energy improvements for which the district has made reimbursement or a direct payment if deemed necessary by the board, measure the total energy savings achieved by the program, monitor the total number of program participants, the total amount paid to contractors, the number of jobs created by the program, the number of defaults by program participants, and the total losses from the defaults, and calculate the total amount of bonds issued by the district. On or before March 1, 2014, and on or before each subsequent March 1, the district shall report to the state, veterans, and military affairs committees of the general assembly, or any successor committees, regarding the information obtained as required by this paragraph (g);

Develop program guidelines governing the terms and conditions under which private third-party financing, other than that obtained through issuance of a district bond, is available to qualified applicants through the program and, in connection therewith, may serve as an aggregating entity for the purpose of securing private third-party financing for new energy improvements pursuant to this article; and

In connection with the financing of new energy improvements either by third parties pursuant to paragraph (h) of this subsection (3) or district bonds and in consultation with representatives from the banking industry and property owners, develop the processes to ensure that mortgage holder consent is obtained in all cases for all eligible real property participating in the program to subordinate the priority of such mortgages to the priority of the lien established in section 32-20-107.

The district shall establish underwriting guidelines that consider program applicants' qualifications, credit-worthiness, home or commercial building equity, and other appropriate factors, including credit reports, credit scores, and loan-to-value ratios, consistent with good and customary lending practices, and as required in order for the district or third parties to obtain a bond rating necessary for a successful bond sale. The district shall also arrange for an appropriate loss reserve in order to obtain the necessary bond rating.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2209, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2013:

IP(3), (3)(d), (3)(e), (3)(g), and (4) amended and (3)(h) and (3)(i) added, (SB 13-212), ch. 347, p. 2016, § 4, effective May 28.

L. 2016:

IP(3) and (3)(i) amended, (SB 16-171), ch. 238, p. 974, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(3) amended, (HB 17-1363), ch. 357, p. 1882, § 1, effective August 9.

Cross references:

In 2013, the introductory portion to subsection (3) and subsections (3)(d), (3)(e), (3)(g), and (4) were amended and subsections (3)(h) and (3)(i) were added by the "New Energy Jobs Act of 2013". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

32-20-106. Special assessments - determination of special benefits - notice and hearing requirements - certification of assessment roll - manner of collection.

The approval by the district of a program application shall establish the qualified applicant who submitted the application as a district member, include the qualified applicant's eligible real property within the boundaries of the district, entitle the district member to reimbursement or a direct payment, and, subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, constitute the consent of the district member to the levying of a special assessment on the district member's eligible real property in an amount that does not exceed the value of:

The special benefit provided to the eligible real property by the new energy improvement; or

The eligible real property.

For the purpose of determining the amount of the special assessment to be levied on a particular unit of eligible real property within the district, "special benefit" includes, but is not limited to:

Repealed.

Any cost of completing a new energy improvement that is defrayed by reimbursement or a direct payment; and

Repealed.

Any acknowledged value of a new energy improvement to a district member's eligible real property set forth in the program application submitted by the district member.

The district may levy a special assessment against eligible real property specially benefited by a new energy improvement based on the cost to the district of the new energy improvement. The district shall initiate the levy of any special assessment by the adoption of a resolution of the board that sets the special assessment, approves the preparation of a preliminary special assessment roll, and sets a date for a public hearing regarding the special assessment roll. The district shall prepare a preliminary special assessment roll listing all special assessments to be levied. The district may post notice of the hearing on the special assessment on any district internet website and shall, except as specified in section 32-20-111, send notice that the special assessment roll has been completed and notice of a hearing on the special assessment roll no later than thirty days before the hearing date to:

Each district member at the postal address or electronic mail address, or both if both are specified, specified in the member's program application; and

Each person, by first-class mail or electronic mail, who has a lien against a unit of eligible real property listed on the assessment roll.

The notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall specify:

The amount of the special assessment proposed to be levied on the unit of eligible real property owned by the district member or subjected to a lien by the lienholder to whom the notice is sent;

That any complaints or objections that are made by a district member or lienholder in writing to the board, and filed in writing on or prior to the date of the hearing, will be heard and determined by the board before the passage of any resolution levying a special assessment; and

The date when and place where the hearing will be held at which complaints or objections made in person will be heard.

Following the hearing required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) and notice pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3), the board shall adopt a resolution resolving all complaints or objections made and levying the special assessments. A district member or lienholder whose complaint or objection is denied by the board shall have thirty days from the date of the denial to appeal the denial to a court of competent jurisdiction. Thereafter, the complaint or objection shall be perpetually barred.

The board shall prepare or cause to be prepared a district special assessment roll in book form showing for each unit of eligible real property assessed, the total amount of special assessment, the amount of each installment of principal and interest if the special assessment is payable in installments, and the date when each installment will become due. The board shall deliver the special assessment roll, duly certified, under the corporate seal, for collection to the treasurer of each county in which the district has assessed eligible real property no later than December 1 of each year.

All special assessments shall be due at the same time as and payable in the same manner as property taxes, as specified in section 39-10-104.5, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Failure to pay any installment on special assessments, whether of principal or interest, when due gives the district the right to declare the installments delinquent, and upon such a declaration the whole amount of the unpaid principal and accrued interest shall thereafter draw interest at the same rate as delinquent property taxes as specified in section 39-10-104.5 (3)(c), C.R.S. The county treasurer shall include the delinquent installment amount as part of the tax lien sale. At any time prior to the day of the tax lien sale, the district member may pay the amount of the delinquent installments, with interest at the penalty rate set by the assessing resolution, and all costs of collection accrued and shall thereupon be restored to the right thereafter to pay in installments in the same manner as if default had not occurred.

Payment of special assessments may be made to a county treasurer at any time after the county assessor has certified the tax roll and the county treasurer is prepared to accept payments for that property tax year, and the county treasurer shall remit all special assessments collected, less the collection fee required by section 32-20-105 (3), to the district in the same manner as taxes are distributed in accordance with section 39-10-107, C.R.S.

Each owner of any divided or undivided interest in eligible real property assessed is jointly and severally liable for the full amount of any special assessment. A special assessment lien remains on the entire property assessed until the entire special assessment is paid, except as otherwise provided pursuant to section 32-20-107.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2212, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2013:

(1) and (2)(b) amended and (2)(a) and (2)(c) repealed, (SB 13-212), ch. 347, p. 2018, § 5, effective May 28.

L. 2016:

IP(3)(a), (4), (5), (7), and (8) amended and (6) repealed, (SB 16-171), ch. 238, p. 975, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(3)(a) amended, (HB 17-1363), ch. 357, p. 1883, § 2, effective August 9.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (1) and (2)(b) were amended and subsections (2)(a) and (2)(c) were repealed by the "New Energy Jobs Act of 2013". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.